New Jersey, session 222, A610.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, or any other rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Civil Service Commission shall exempt from civil service examination requirements individuals applying for the title of Claims Examiner within the Department of Labor and Workforce Development after the effective date of this act, P.L.   , c.   (pending before the Legislature as this bill). The exemption from examination requirements shall continue for 24 months from the date of enactment of this act.  Before the end of the exemption period, the individual shall meet the eligibility requirements, and take and pass the appropriate civil service examination, to retain employment and the title of Claims Examiner. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.